Massachusetts, session 194th, H3728.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 23 of Chapter 90 of the 2018 General Laws, as amended by section 67, is hereby
amended in paragraph two by inserting, after the words “(1) of section twenty-four,” the
following:-
“pursuant to paragraph (f)(1) of subdivision (1) of section twenty-four,”;
and in the same paragraph by inserting, after the words “section eight A or section eight
B of chapter ninety B, or pursuant to a violation of section 8, 9 or 11 of chapter ninety F,” the
following:-
“ or pursuant to a similar or like statute of another jurisdiction,” ;
of 2

and in the same paragraph by inserting, after the words “right to operate or the issuance
to him of a new license to operate,” the following:-
“or whoever operates a motor vehicle in violation of the terms of a hardship license
granted pursuant to M.G.L. Chapters 90, 90A or 90B,” ;
and in paragraph four by inserting, after the words “pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subdivision (1) of sections 24, sections 24G or 24L, subsection (a) of section 8 of chapter 90B,
sections 8A or 8B of chapter 90B or section 13 ½ of chapter 265 ,” the following:-
“or pursuant to a similar or like statute of another jurisdiction, or whoever operates a
motor vehicle in violation of paragraph (a) of subdivision (1) of section 24, sections 24G or 24L,
subsection (a) of section 8 of chapter 90B, sections 8A or 8B of chapter 90B or section 13 ½ of
chapter 265 , where such operation was pursuant to a hardship license granted pursuant to
M.G.L. Chapters 90, 90A or 90B or where such operation was outside the terms of such hardship
license,
of 2